Maryland, session 2026, HB0355.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–439.
(a) In this section, “nonpublic school” means a noncollegiate educational
institution that:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0355*

HOUSE BILL 355
(1) Holds a certificate of approval from the State Board under § 2–206(e) of
this article; and
(2) Participates in the Nonpublic Schools Textbook and Technology Grants
Program.
(b) (1) The State Board and each nonpublic school in the State shall develop
and implement a program of age–appropriate education on the awareness and prevention
of sexual abuse and assault.
(2) The program required under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall [be]:
(i) [Taught] BE TAUGHT by a teacher who is trained to provide
instruction on the awareness and prevention of sexual abuse and assault; [and]
(ii) [Incorporated] BE INCORPORATED into the health curriculum
of each county board and each nonpublic school; AND
(III) INCLUDE, FOR STUDENTS IN GRADES 6 THROUGH 8,
MATERIAL PROMOTING THE AWARENESS AND PREVENTION OF HUMAN AND SEX
TRAFFICKING.
(c) The State Board shall adopt regulations to carry out the provisions of this
section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.